Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-805 Effectiveness of action
taken before July 1, 2013. (a) If a financing statement is filed prior to
July 1, 2013, to perfect a security interest, that filing shall be effective to
the extent that it satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under
this article.

(b) A financing statement that was filed prior
to July 1, 2013, shall be effective if it satisfies the applicable requirements
for perfection under the then-existing state law; provided that except as
provided in subsections (c) and (d) and section 490:9-806, the financing
statement shall cease to be effective:

(1) If the financing statement was filed in this
State, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under
the then-existing state law; or

(2) If the financing statement was filed in another
jurisdiction, at the earlier of:

(A) The time the financing statement would
have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

(B) June 30, 2018.

(c) The filing of a continuation statement on
or after July 1, 2013, shall not continue the effectiveness of a financing
statement filed prior to July 1, 2013; provided that upon the timely filing of
a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, in accordance with the law
of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this article, the
effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that
jurisdiction prior to July 1, 2013, shall continue for the period provided by
the law of that jurisdiction.

(d) Subsection (b)(2)(B) shall apply to a
financing statement that is filed prior to July 1, 2013, against a transmitting
utility and that satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the
law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this article as it
existed prior to July 1, 2013, only to the extent that this article provides
that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the
financing statement was filed governs perfection of a security interest in
collateral covered by the financing statement.

(e) A financing statement that includes a
financing statement filed prior to July 1, 2013, and a continuation statement
filed on or after July 1, 2013, shall be effective only to the extent that it
satisfies the requirements of section 490:9-806. A financing statement that
indicates that the debtor is a decedent's estate indicates that the collateral
is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of section
490:9‑503(a)(2). A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is
a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust indicates
that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of section 490:9-503(a)(3).
[L 2012, c 33, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next